Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 11 Local Police And Fire Pension And Relief Funds
Subchapter 4
— Police Pension and Relief Funds — Cities of the First Class

Preambles.

Acts 1941, No. 16 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, at the general election held November 5, 1940, the people of the State of Arkansas adopted Amendment No. 31 to the Constitution of the State of Arkansas authorizing cities of the first and second class to vote a tax on the assessed value of real and personal property within such city not to exceed one mill on the dollar to pay pensions to retired policemen, and pensions to the widows and minor children of deceased policemen and widows and minor children of deceased retired policemen, in such manner as shall be provided by law;

“Therefore…”.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1937, No. 250, § 24: Effective on passage.

Acts 1939, No. 11, § 3: Approved Jan. 24, 1939. Emergency clause provided: “Because of the fact that there are needy members of the Police Departments of the Cities of this State who are entitled to receive pensions under Act 250 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 1937, and funds provided to pay such pensions are insufficient, resulting in deprivation to those entitled to relief, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1939, No. 196, § 3: Mar. 9, 1939. Emergency clause provided: “On account of the immediate need of disabled and superannuated policemen of the cities affected by this act, and there being no provision for their relief an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage, and approval.”

Acts 1941, No. 16, § 5: Approved Jan. 30, 1941. Emergency clause provided: “The method of levying a tax on the real and personal property of cities for the benefit of the Policemen's Pension and Relief Fund, under Act No. 25 of the Acts of the Arkansas General Assembly for the year 1939, having been declared unconstitutional by the Supreme Court of the State of Arkansas, it is ascertained and declared to be a fact that in many cities of this state the Policemen's Pension and Relief Find is depleted; that in such cities there are many disabled and retired policemen, and widows and minor children of deceased policemen, and widows and minor children of deceased retired policemen, without any other source of income, and in need of the assistance that was contemplated under Act No. 25 of the Acts of 1939; that the existing laws make no provision for the respective municipalities to provide for pensions for such persons; that the passage of this act will enable such municipalities to vote on the question of a tax levy for policemen retirement salaries and pensions, and pensions to widows and minor children of deceased policemen and widows and minor children of deceased retired policemen; therefore, in order to protect the public peace, health and safety of the citizenship of such municipalities, an emergency is declared to exist, and all laws and parts of laws in conflict herewith, be, and the same are hereby repealed, and this act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1941, No. 82, § 3: Effective on passage.

Acts 1945, No. 176, § 4: Approved Mar. 2, 1945. Emergency clause provided: “This act being necessary for the immediate protection of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared and this act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1967, No. 127, § 4: Approved Feb. 22, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly of the State of Arkansas hereby finds and declares that the present pension provisions are not adequate to provide for a policeman's dependents; that the cost of living is rapidly rising and that in some cases the pensions provided under this Act are the only means of support that such dependents have; that it will require additional time for the Board of Trustees of the Policemen's Pension and Relief Fund to make the necessary changes in administrative procedures to effectuate the provisions of this Act; that it is necessary that the provisions of this Act become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in effect from and after the date of its approval and passage.”

Acts 1969, No. 68, § 3: Feb. 18, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to attract qualified and capable policemen, it is necessary to offer an adequate pension in the case of retirement; that under the present provisions, policemen in border cities are required to contribute only two and one-half percent of their monthly salaries to such pension fund instead of four percent as in the case in other cities; that an increase in the amount of contributions to such fund will permit the payment of a more adequate pension to such policemen upon retirement; and that in order to provide adequate funds to grant sufficient pensions for retired policemen, it is necessary that this Act become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1969, No. 288, § 3: Mar. 21, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It has been determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there are a number of policemen of advanced age who retired several years ago prior to the inflation which has occurred in recent years and that the amount of the pensions drawn by them is so low that many of them are in dire need. An emergency is therefore declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 486, § 4: Jan. 1, 1982.

Acts 1981, No. 987, § 3: Became law without Governor's signature, Apr. 8, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that increased retirement longevity benefits are necessary in certain instances to retain qualified police officers, and that this Act is immediately necessary to provide for such increased benefits. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 10, § 4: Feb. 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 438 of 1981 has been interpreted as applying only to towns of less than 8,000 population; that it was the intent of the General Assembly to allow all funds to grant the increased benefits provided herein; and that this Act is necessary to carry out the legislative intent previously expressed and to promote uniformity among all Policemen's Pension and Relief Funds. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 44, § 4: Feb. 3, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 582 of 1981 which increased benefits payable to survivors of police officers did not clearly state its applicability to current recipients; that the various local systems have interpreted the law differently; and that this Act is necessary to carry out the legislative intent expressed in 1981 and to promote uniformity among these pension plans. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 462, § 3: Mar. 15, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that a small portion of retired policemen retired under a law which did not allow them to receive one-half (½) the pay attached to their rank at the time of retirement and that such benefits are totally inadequate today; and that this Act is immediately necessary to increase such benefits. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 653, § 2: July 1, 1983.

Acts 1985, No. 391, § 3: Mar. 18, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the minimum monthly benefit for retired policemen should be two hundred and fifty dollars ($250.00); that some retired policemen receive less than two hundred and fifty dollars ($250.00) per month in retirement benefits; and that this Act is immediately necessary to increase such benefits. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 405, § 4: Mar. 25, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that an active member of a police pension fund should be allowed to serve on a local pension board when no retirant is available to serve; that local police pension boards of trustees are uncertain of their composition when no retirant is available to serve; and that this act is immediately necessary to end such uncertainty. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 152, § 7: Feb. 21, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that confusion exists regarding whether bank trust officers may serve as investment advisers to local police and fire pension funds; that it was never the intent that bank trust officers not be authorized to so act; that this Act clarifies the law to specifically authorize bank trust officers to serve as investment advisers to the local police and fire pension funds; and that this Act should be given effect immediately in order to eliminate the confusion. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 546, § 8: Mar. 16, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that allowing unused, accrued sick leave to be counted as salary for retirement purposes will enhance the municipal police officers' and fire fighters program for retirement; that police officers and fireman will thereby be motivated to work more productive hours with less absenteeism; and that the use of unused, accrued sick leave for retirement salaries is necessary for the most efficient and effective operation of the municipal police and fire departments of Arkansas. Therefore, in order to achieve the maximum use of municipal police officers' and fire fighters services, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 1289, § 6: Apr. 21, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Arkansas Code 24-11-413 provided that ten percent (10%) of fines and forfeitures collected by city police departments are to be deposited into the police pension fund; that some police departments have also collected costs and deposited in those funds; that this act clarifies the law to specifically require ten percent (10%) of those costs to be deposited into the funds; and that until this act takes effect the law is unclear on this point. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 1012, § 5: Became law without Governor's signature. Noted Apr. 5, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that some cities have police retirement plans which no longer accept new members and which are overfunded; that the surplus revenues should be put to beneficial use; that this act will establish the mechanism for putting those funds to beneficial use for the citizens of the city; and that this act should go into effect as soon as possible to provide desperately needed funds to the municipalities affected hereby. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1999, No. 978, § 7: Mar. 31, 1999. Emergency clause provided: It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that Act 1241 of 1997 allowed the surviving spouses of police officers killed while in the official performance of his duties to continue to receive benefits if they remarried, that Act 1241 of 1997 became effective on August 1, 1997, and that surviving spouses of police officers killed while on duty prior to the effective date of Act 1241 lost retirement benefits upon any remarriage and should be able to benefit from this subsequent change in the law by making it retroactive. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1457, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that this act revises the law concerning the Arkansas Police Officers' Deferred Option Plan and the Arkansas Fire Fighters' Deferred Retirement Option Plan; and that, for the effective administration of this act, its provisions should become effective on July 1, 1999. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2009, No. 32, § 2, provided: “Section 1 of this act shall be effective retroactive to July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2009, No. 1201, § 9: Apr. 7, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the statutes relating to payments from the local pension and relief funds need amending in order for the investments of the assets in the local pension and relief funds to be consistent with the practicalities of the market. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 117: Apr. 10, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes various revisions to Arkansas election laws that are designed to improve the administration of elections and special elections and that these revisions should be implemented as soon as possible so that the citizens of this state may benefit from improved election procedures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 556, § 6: Mar. 22, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board is in place to provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas, that the statutes need amending to account for changes in the economy, and that these citizens need to be immediately covered by these changes. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 41, § 37: Feb. 6, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the local police and fire retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

24-11-401. Applicability.

This subchapter shall not apply to any city that had a policemen's pension and relief fund on June 10, 1937.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 250, § 21; Pope's Dig., § 9876; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1820.

24-11-402. Vote to effect subchapter.

The provisions of this subchapter shall be suspended and inoperative in any city affected by the provisions of this subchapter until made available by a vote favorable thereto of the majority of qualified electors of the cities participating in any election on the question and held at a special election in accordance with § 7-11-201 et seq. for the purpose of voting on the question.

The election may be held in connection with the first general city election following the passage and approval of this subchapter, but the failure to submit at that city or other election shall not defeat the right of submission at any subsequent election.

Upon filing with the county board of election commissioners not later than seventy (70) days before the date of the election the petition signed by twenty (20) or more qualified electors of the city affected and praying that the question of policemen's pension be submitted, it shall be the duty of the county board of election commissioners to place the question upon the ballot.

In the event that for any reason the question of policemen's pension was not voted upon in the next general city election after June 10, 1937, the question may be submitted at a special election in accordance with § 7-11-201 et seq. held in the city as provided in this section.

The question on the ballot shall be as follows:

“FOR Policemen's Pension
AGAINST Policemen's Pension

Click to view form.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 250, § 22; Pope's Dig., § 9877; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1821; Acts 2005, No. 2145, § 62; 2007, No. 1049, § 84; 2009, No. 1480, §§ 102, 103.

Publisher's Notes.

In reference to the term “passage and approval of this subchapter,” Acts 1937, No. 250 was signed by the Governor on March 16, 1937, and became effective on June 10, 1937. Emergency clause invalid.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “§ 7-11-201 et seq.” for “§ 7-5-103(b)” in (a) and (d).

24-11-403. Creation of fund — Tax levy.

Annually, a tax not to exceed one (1) mill on the dollar of all taxable property in any cities or towns in this state is levied as a fund for pensioned and superannuated members of the police department, for the surviving spouses and minor children or dependent parents of deceased members of the police department, and to relieve the members in case of temporary disability.

This fund shall be known as the “policemen's pension and relief fund” and shall be collected as other taxes are collected and shall be turned over to the board of trustees of the policemen's pension and relief fund, as provided in this section.

In those cities which do not have a policemen's pension and relief fund but which cover their police officers under the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, the tax, once approved by a majority of those voting on the question, shall be collected annually as other taxes are collected and shall be turned over to each city to be applied to each city's account in that system, in such manner and amounts as determined by the board of trustees of that system.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 250, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 9856; Acts 1939, No. 196, § 1; 1945, No. 176, § 1; 1985, No. 900, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1801.

24-11-404. Tax levy for pensions in cities of first and second class.

After being once approved by a majority of those voting on the question at any general or special election in any city of the first class or city of the second class, a tax not to exceed one (1) mill on the dollar upon the assessed value of the real and personal property of the city shall be levied annually by the city for the purpose of paying police officers' retirement salaries and pensions, as well as pensions to the surviving spouses and minor children of deceased police officers and the surviving spouses and minor children of deceased retired police officers.

The levy shall be made by the city council or other governing body of the city on or before the time fixed by law for levying county taxes, and the city council or other governing body shall make out and certify to the county clerk the rate of taxation levied by the municipal corporation on the real and personal property within the city.

The amount so certified shall be placed upon the tax book by the county clerk of the county and collected in the same manner that state and county taxes are collected and shall be turned over to the board of trustees of the policemen's pension and relief fund of the city.

In those cities that do not have a policemen's pension and relief fund but that cover their police officers under the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, the tax shall also be allowed when approved by a majority of qualified electors of the cities participating in any election on the question and held at a special election in accordance with § 7-11-201 et seq. for the purpose of voting on the question.

The election may be held in connection with the first general city election following March 6, 1989, but the failure to submit at a city or other election shall not defeat the right of submission at any subsequent election.

Upon the filing with the county board of election commissioners not later than ninety (90) days before the date of the election requested in a petition signed by twenty (20) or more qualified electors of the city affected and praying that the question of a policemen's pension be submitted, it shall be the duty of the county board of election commissioners to call the election in accordance with § 7-11-201 et seq.

In the event that for any reason the question of the policemen's pension is not voted upon in the next general city election after March 6, 1989, the question may be submitted at a special election held in the city as provided in this subsection.

The question on the ballot shall be as follows:

The tax so levied shall not exceed one (1) mill on the dollar upon the assessed value of the real and personal property of the city or town.

Once so approved, the tax shall be levied and certified in the same manner as provided in this section and shall be collected and turned over to the city or town for the sole purpose of making payment for coverage of employees under the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System.

A vote on the question of the tax provided for in this section shall be had in the same manner that the Arkansas Constitution and laws of this state provide for the initiation of measures in municipalities.

The funds provided for in this section shall be supplemental and in addition to any funds provided for by any laws in effect at the time of passage of this section and shall become part of the policemen's pension and relief fund of the city and be administered by the board of trustees of the policemen's pension and relief fund for the same class of beneficiaries and in the same manner as prescribed by law.

In those cities that cover their police officers under the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, the funds shall be applied to each city's account in that system, in such manner and amounts as determined by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, if:

The city does not have a policemen's pension and relief fund; or

The city has consolidated administration of its policemen's pension and relief fund with the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, even if there are no longer any members or beneficiaries remaining under the city's policemen's pension and relief fund.

“FOR Policemen's Pension
[ ]

AGAINST Policemen's Pension
.....[ ]”.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 16, §§ 1, 2, 4; 1985, No. 900, §§ 1, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-1707, 19-1708, 19-1710; Acts 1989, No. 341, § 1; 2005, No. 2145, § 63; 2007, No. 608, § 1; 2007, No. 1049, § 85; 2009, No. 1480, § 104.

Publisher's Notes.

In reference to the term, “passage of this section,” Acts 1941, No. 16 was signed by the Governor and took effect January 30, 1941.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “§ 7-11-201 et seq.” for “§ 7-5-103(b)” in (b)(1) and (b)(3).

24-11-405. Board of trustees.

The board of trustees of the policemen's pension and relief fund shall consist of seven (7) members as follows:

The chief executive officer of the city, who shall be chair of the board;

The city treasurer, who shall be treasurer of the fund;

Five (5) active or retired members of the pension fund.

The active pension fund members shall elect the active members by secret written ballot in May of each year, with the member or members to be chosen in alternating years.

The retired member or members shall be chosen in May of each year by a method to be determined by the board, with the member or members to be chosen in alternating years.

All member trustees shall serve two-year terms.

In the event of a vacancy in a board position, the board of trustees shall appoint a replacement to serve the remainder of the unexpired term.

If there are no active members of the pension fund, all five (5) employee members shall be elected by the retired membership of the pension fund and the surviving spouses of deceased members currently receiving benefits.

The board shall select one (1) of the police members as secretary of the board to serve for a period of two (2) years or until his or her successor is elected and qualified.

However, if no retirant is available to serve on the board, all five (5) employee positions shall be held by active members of the pension fund and shall be elected by secret ballot by the active members of the pension fund for two-year terms as provided in subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section.

The board shall have the power to make all rules needful for its guidance to implement the provisions regarding board composition; and

The number of active members or retired members to serve on the board shall be determined by the proportionate number of active members to retired members as follows:

When the number of active members equals seventy-five percent (75%) of the total of retired members and active members, the board shall be composed of four (4) active members and one (1) retired member;

When the number of active members equals fifty percent (50%) of the total of retired members and active members, the board shall be composed of three (3) active members and two (2) retired members; and

When the number of retired members equals seventy-five percent (75%) of the total of retired members and active members, the board shall be composed of one (1) active member and four (4) retired members.

The police officer members of the board shall serve for a period of two (2) years or until their successors are elected and qualified.

The board shall have the absolute control and management of the funds provided for in this subchapter and of all moneys donated, paid, or assessed for the relief or pension of disabled, superannuated, and retired members of the police department, their surviving spouses and minor children, or dependent parents solely dependent upon members for their support.

The board shall make all necessary rules for its government and the discharge of its duties and shall hear and decide all applications for pension and relief under this subchapter.

All decisions upon applications shall be final and conclusive and not subject to review or reversal except by the board.

The board shall keep a record of all its meetings and proceedings.

Each member of the board of trustees of the policemen's pension and relief fund who receives gifts or other compensation that in total exceeds one hundred dollars ($100), including, but not limited to, trips and meals, from current or potential investment advisors or managers of the policemen's pension and relief fund shall prepare an annual statement listing:

Each item received;

The estimated value of each item; and

From whom each item was received.

Each member of the board of trustees of the policemen's pension and relief fund shall attest by written affidavit that the member's annual statement is true and current to the best of his or her knowledge.

An annual statement and affidavit from each member of the board of trustees of the policemen's pension and relief fund shall be collected by the board of trustees of the policemen's pension and relief fund or the municipal treasurer.

One (1) copy of the statement and affidavit shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

A second copy of each statement and affidavit shall be retained on file by the board of trustees of the policemen's pension and relief fund or the municipal treasurer and shall be available for review by any plan participant.

As part of the annual report to the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board, the chair of each board of trustees of the policemen's pension and relief fund for each plan shall certify that the statements and affidavits as described in this subsection have been completed and appropriately filed.

Each plan's annual report shall not be considered complete without this certification.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 250, §§ 3, 4; Pope's Dig., §§ 9858, 9859; Acts 1985, No. 390, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-1803, 19-1804; Acts 1987, No. 405, § 2; 1991, No. 365, § 1; 2003, No. 778, § 1; 2005, No. 386, § 1; 2005, No. 2094, § 3; Acts 2007, No. 611, § 1; 2007, No. 827, § 192; 2009, No. 260, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to Acts 2007, No. 827, § 240, the amendment of § 24-11-405 by Acts 2007, No. 611, § 1 supersedes the amendment of § 24-11-405 by Acts 2007, No. 827, § 192.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted “that in total exceed one hundred dollars ($100)” in (e)(1).

24-11-406. Administration of small funds by Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System.

In those local police pension and relief funds that cover fewer than five (5) members, a local board of trustees may no longer exist, and the fund shall be designated as inactive by the employer.

As used in this section, “member” includes an active member or a retired member of the fund described in subdivision (a)(1) of this section but does not include beneficiaries.

Administrative responsibility for the fund shall be assigned to the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, as allowed by §§ 24-10-301 and 24-10-302 and as provided in the following procedure:

The actuary under contract to the system shall compute the retirement reserve for vested and active members and for eligible beneficiaries of the inactive fund. After receiving the report of the actuary, the employer shall transfer the computed reserve to the system to be held in an account designated as the retirement reserve for the inactive fund and from which the system shall pay eligible beneficiaries.

The retirement reserve and any additional employer contributions shall include such amounts as are necessary to provide administrative expenses for the system, but such expenses shall not exceed a total of one-half of one percent (0.5%) of active member payroll, if any, plus one percent (1%) of annual reserve assets;

Any excess assets of the fund remaining after the retirement reserve is created shall be transferred to an account designated by the employer, to be used solely for the purpose of making payments to the system for employee coverage administered under the system and for no other purpose;

If a former member of the local pension fund returns to service in which the employee would have again become a member of the local fund, the past service credit may be purchased by the employer for the employee under the system, and the purchase costs shall be amortized in the same manner as other service credit purchases are amortized under the system;

Retired members and beneficiaries of any inactive fund under administration of the system that was actuarially sound before being designated inactive shall be eligible for annual redetermination of benefits as defined in § 24-10-612.

Should the law mandate an increase in benefits to retired members or their beneficiaries, the increases shall be payable from the retirement reserve of the inactive fund.

No prorating of benefits shall be allowed in inactive funds under the administration of the system.

If the retirement reserve of an inactive fund shall become inadequate to pay full benefits to eligible recipients, the system shall require of the employer, and the employer shall remit, such actuarially computed amounts as are necessary to pay full benefits to current and future eligible recipients;

Once a fund becomes inactive and a retirement reserve is created as required by this section, the employer may continue to collect such millages, fines, fees, state insurance tax turnback, and other revenues as allowed by law for the support of police retirement programs.

The revenues shall be deposited locally in an account designated by the employer solely for making payments to the system and shall be used for no other purpose; and

All employer contributions for inactive funds shall be made in such amounts, and in such manner, form, and frequency, as the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall require.

The pension records of inactive funds, and other materials and reports as may be required by the board to administer the inactive funds, shall be provided to the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System in such manner as the board shall require.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 250, § 4; Pope's Dig., § 9859; Acts 1985, No. 927, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1804; Acts 2007, No. 1056, §§ 1, 2.

24-11-407. List of retired police officers.

There shall be kept in the office of the board of trustees by the secretary a book known as the list of retired police officers.

This book shall give the full and complete history and record of action of the board of trustees in retiring any and all persons under this subchapter.

The record shall give the name, date of joining the department, date of retirement and reason thereof, and the date and finding of the physician of each examination made of disabled members of the department retired under the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 250, § 12; Pope's Dig., § 9867; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1812.

24-11-408. Treasurer as custodian of fund.

The treasurer shall be the custodian of the pension fund and shall keep his or her books and accounts concerning the funds in such manner as may be prescribed by the board.

The books and accounts shall be subject to the inspection of any member of the board.

Within ten (10) days after his or her selection, the treasurer shall execute a bond to the board of trustees with good and sufficient securities, in such penal sum as the board shall direct, conditioned for the faithful performance of the duties of his or her office and that, on the expiration or retirement of his or her term of office, he or she shall surrender and deliver to his or her successor all unexpended moneys and all property which may have come into his or her hands as treasurer of the fund.

The bond shall be filed in the office of the board of trustees, and, in case of a breach of the bond, suit may be brought on the bond in the name of the board or in the name of any person or persons injured by the breach.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 250, § 17; Pope's Dig., § 9872; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1817.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The operation of subsection (c) of this section was suspended by adoption of a self-insured fidelity bond program for public officers, officials and employees, effective July 20, 1987, pursuant to § 21-2-701 et seq. The subsection may again become effective upon cessation of coverage under that program. See § 21-2-703.

24-11-409. Deposit of moneys.

The board shall deposit all moneys in the bank selected as the fiscal agent of the city in which it is located, but only if the moneys draw the same rate of interest as the city receives on its deposits. Otherwise, the board shall make its own selection of the bank.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 250, § 14; Pope's Dig., § 9869; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-1814.